Yamls/Pron-byd_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
#  The were proofread for golden standard by Larisa Ponomareva 2019-10-22
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


   Pronoun – быд: # Total Pronoun 'Jokainen / Всякий, любой'
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Nom+Compl: быд
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Acc: быдӧс
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Gen: быдлӧн
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Abl: быдлісь
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Dat: быдлӧ
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Ins: быдӧн 
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Com: быдкӧт
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Car: быдтӧг
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Cns: быдла
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Cmpr: быдся
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Ine: быдын
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Ela: быдісь
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Ill: быдӧ
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Apr: быдлань
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Egr: быдсянь
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Prl: быдӧт
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+TerI: быдӧдз
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+TerII: быдви
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprIne: быдланьын
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprEla: быдланись
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprIll: быдланьӧ
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprEgr: быдланьсянь
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprPrl: быдланьӧт
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprTerI: быдланьӧдз
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprTerII: быдланьви


    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: быдыс
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: быдсӧ
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: быдыслӧн
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: быдыслісь
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: быдыслӧ
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Ins+PxSg3: быднас 
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Com+PxSg3: быдыскӧт
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Car+PxSg3: быдыстӧг
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Cns+PxSg3: быдысла
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg3: быдысся
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Ine+PxSg3: быдас
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Ela+PxSg3: быдсис
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: быдас
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Apr+PxSg3: [быдыслань, быдланяс]
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Egr+PxSg3: [быдыссянь, быдсяняс]
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+Prl+PxSg3: [быдӧттяс, быдӧттис]
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+TerI+PxSg3: [быдӧдззас, быдӧдззис]
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+TerII+PxSg3: быдысви
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprIne+PxSg3: [быдланяс, быдысланьын]
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprEla+PxSg3: [быдланьсис, быдысланись]
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprIll+PxSg3: [быдланяс, быдысланьӧ]
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprEgr+PxSg3: [быдысланьсянь, быдланьсяняс]
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprPrl+PxSg3: [быдланьӧттяс, быдланьӧттис, быдысланьӧт]
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprTerI+PxSg3: [быдланьӧдззас, быдланьӧдззис, быдысланьӧдз]
    быд+Pron+Tot+Sg+AprTerII+PxSg3: быдысланьви
